lexd_components/hye-verbs_paradigms_with_lex.lexd
VerbRootBeLongPresHye(1) VZero VerbRootBeLongPresHye(2): ThE Inf #  Irregular Irregular լինել
VerbRootComePres(1) VZero VerbRootComePres(2): ThA Inf # irregular գալ եկայ
VerbRootCry(1) VZero VerbRootCry(2): ThA Inf # լալ
VerbRootCryLong(1) VZero VerbRootCryLong(2): ThE Inf # լացել
VerbRootGivePres(1) VZero VerbRootGivePres(2): ThA Inf # տալ
VerbRootBring(1) VZero VerbRootBring(2): ThE Inf # բերել
VerbRootTurnPres(1) VZero VerbRootTurnPres(2):  EmptyNasal ThA Inf # դառնալ
VerbRootBarnalHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootBarnalHyePres(2):  EmptyNasal ThA Inf #  բառնալ
VerbRootTake(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootTake(2): ThE Inf # առնել
VerbRootSeeA(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootSeeA(2): ThA Inf # տեսնել
VerbRootSeeE(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootSeeE(2): ThE Inf # տեսնալ
VerbRootSeeReducedHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootSeeReducedHyePres(2): ThA Inf #  տենալ
VerbRootOpenAffr(1) VZero VerbRootOpenAffr(2): ThE Inf #  բացել
VerbRootOpenNasalPres(1) VZero VerbRootOpenNasalPres(2): ThA Inf #  բանալ
VerbRootPutPres(1) VZero VerbRootPutPres(2): ThE Inf # դնել
VerbRootGoPres(1) VZero VerbRootGoPres(2): ThA Inf # երթալ
VerbRootHitStop(1) VZero VerbRootHitStop(2): ThE Inf # 
VerbRootDoPres(1) VZero VerbRootDoPres(2): ThE Inf # ընել
VerbRootSay(1) VZero VerbRootSay(2): ThE Inf # ըսել
VerbRootEatPres(1) VZero VerbRootEatPres(2): ThE Inf # ուտել
VerbRootSendPresHye(1) VZero VerbRootSendPresHye(2): ThE Inf #  տանիլ

VerbRootWalkHye(1) VZero VerbRootWalkHye(2): ThE Inf #  քելել
VerbRootStandHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootStandHyePres(2):  ThA Inf   # 
VerbRootWetHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootWetHyePres(2):  ThA Inf   # 

#Following defective verbs lack infinitival for Boyacioglu, but they have one in Kouyoumdjian
VerbRootHaveHye(1) VZero VerbRootHaveHye(2): ThE Inf #  ունել
VerbRootKnow(1) VZero VerbRootKnow(2): ThE Inf # գիտել 
VerbRootWorth(1) VZero VerbRootWorth(2): ThE Inf # արժել 
VerbRootCanShort(1) VZero VerbRootCanShort(2): ThA Inf # կարամ 

PATTERN ImperfConverbHye
# Imperfective converb for hye
VerbStemE   ImpfConvSuffix
VerbStemA   ImpfConvSuffix 

CausBase CausPres  ImpfConvSuffix
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicSchwa VZero  CausOrthographicSchwaPres  ImpfConvSuffix # [<caus_listed>:]
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffr VZero  CausOrthographicAffrPres  ImpfConvSuffix # [<caus_listed>:]
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffrSchwa VZero CausOrthographicAffrSchwaPres  ImpfConvSuffix #  [<caus_listed>:]


PassBase Pass ImpfConvSuffix


InchBase InchNasal ImpfConvSuffix
InchBaseWashHye InchNasal ImpfConvSuffix

# irregulars
VerbRootNelHye(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelHye(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootNelTogHye(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelTogHye(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootCelHye(1) EmptyAffr VZero VerbRootCelHye(2): ImpfConvSuffix  
VerbRootNelNale(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelNale(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootNelNala(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelNala(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootSeeE(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootSeeE(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootSeeA(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootSeeA(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootSeeReducedHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootSeeReducedHyePres(2): ImpfConvSuffix 

VerbRootRiseEPres(1) VZero VerbRootRiseEPres(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootRiseAPres(1) VZero VerbRootRiseAPres(2): ImpfConvSuffix

VerbRootBeLongPresHye(1)  VZero VerbRootBeLongPresHye(2): ImpfConvSuffix

VerbRootCry(1) VZero VerbRootCry(2): ImpfConvSuffixIrregHye # լալ
VerbRootCryLong(1) VZero VerbRootCryLong(2): ImpfConvSuffix # լացել 
VerbRootGivePres(1) VZero VerbRootGivePres(2): ImpfConvSuffixIrregHye 
VerbRootComePres(1) VZero VerbRootComePres(2): ImpfConvSuffixIrregHye 

VerbRootBring(1) VZero VerbRootBring(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootTurnPres(1) VZero VerbRootTurnPres(2): EmptyNasal ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootBarnalHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootBarnalHyePres(2): EmptyNasal ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootTake(1) VZero VerbRootTake(2): EmptyNasal ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootOpenAffr(1) VZero VerbRootOpenAffr(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootOpenNasalPres(1) VZero VerbRootOpenNasalPres(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootPutPres(1) VZero VerbRootPutPres(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootGoPres(1) VZero VerbRootGoPres(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootHitStop(1) VZero VerbRootHitStop(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootDoPres(1) VZero VerbRootDoPres(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootSay(1) VZero VerbRootSay(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootEatPres(1) VZero VerbRootEatPres(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootSendPresHye(1) VZero VerbRootSendPresHye(2): ImpfConvSuffix 

VerbRootWalkHye(1) VZero VerbRootWalkHye(2): ImpfConvSuffix 
VerbRootStandHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootStandHyePres(2):  ImpfConvSuffix   
VerbRootWetHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootWetHyePres(2):  ImpfConvSuffix   



PATTERN ConditionalHye
# conditional form in hye only
:CondHyePrefix Subjunctive   CondHyePrefix:

PATTERN Subjunctive
SubjStem Subj0
SubjBaseMonoStem Subj0

#irregulars that lack prefix in indicative
# seems useless for hye
# SubjunctiveIrregular


PATTERN SubjStem
#Stem is base(root+th) and the agreement
#present
SubjBase Pres0 PresAgr 
#impefect
SubjBase ImpfAgr 


PATTERN SubjBase
#Base of verb for regular Subjunctive (without hyw prefix)
#Base is root till theme vowel
#Present
VerbStemE ThE 
VerbStemA ThA 

CausBase CausPres ThE
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicSchwa VZero CausOrthographicSchwaPres ThE #  [<caus_listed>:]
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffr VZero CausOrthographicAffrPres ThE #  [<caus_listed>:]
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffrSchwa VZero  CausOrthographicAffrSchwaPres ThE Inf # [<caus_listed>:]


PassBase Pass ThE  #   


InchBase InchNasal ThA 
InchBaseWashHye InchNasal ThA # 


# VerbRootUv(1) VZero VerbRootUv(2): ThU	#Unclear which one is preferred because archaic
# VerbRootUv(1) VZero VerbRootUv(2): ThE 
# VerbRootUcanel(1) VZero VerbRootUcanel(2): ThA EmptyNasal ThE  # Dir/LR

VerbRootNelHye(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelHye(2): ThE  # 
VerbRootNelTogHye(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelTogHye(2): ThE  # 
VerbRootCelHye(1) EmptyAffr VZero VerbRootCelHye(2): ThE #   
VerbRootNelNale(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelNale(2): ThE
VerbRootNelNala(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNelNala(2): ThA

VerbRootRiseEPres(1) VZero VerbRootRiseEPres(2): ThE
VerbRootRiseAPres(1) VZero VerbRootRiseAPres(2): ThA
VerbRootBeLongPresHye(1) VZero VerbRootBeLongPresHye(2): ThE  # 
VerbRootCryLong(1) VZero VerbRootCryLong(2): ThE 

VerbRootBring(1) VZero VerbRootBring(2): ThE
VerbRootTurnPres(1) VZero VerbRootTurnPres(2):  EmptyNasal ThA
VerbRootBarnalHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootBarnalHyePres(2):  EmptyNasal ThA # 
VerbRootTake(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootTake(2): ThE
VerbRootSeeA(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootSeeA(2): ThA
VerbRootSeeE(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootSeeE(2): ThE
VerbRootSeeReducedHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootSeeReducedHyePres(2): ThA # 
VerbRootOpenAffr(1) VZero VerbRootOpenAffr(2): ThE # 
VerbRootOpenNasalPres(1) VZero VerbRootOpenNasalPres(2): ThA # 
VerbRootPutPres(1) VZero VerbRootPutPres(2): ThE
VerbRootGoPres(1) VZero VerbRootGoPres(2): ThA 
VerbRootHitStop(1) VZero VerbRootHitStop(2): ThE # 
VerbRootDoPres(1) VZero VerbRootDoPres(2): ThE
VerbRootSay(1) VZero VerbRootSay(2): ThE
VerbRootEatPres(1) VZero VerbRootEatPres(2): ThE
VerbRootSendPresHye(1) VZero VerbRootSendPresHye(2): ThE # 

VerbRootWalkHye(1) VZero VerbRootWalkHye(2): ThE # 
VerbRootStandHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootStandHyePres(2):  ThA    # 
VerbRootWetHyePres(1) VZero VerbRootWetHyePres(2): ThA # 

#I think Boyacioglu has an error because the -i- stayed -i- here

# boyaciouglu didnt have indicative կը կարենամ but it can be formed for abstract contexts


PATTERN SubjBaseMonoStem
#Monosyllabic verbs which take the prefix gu- in hyw, and have special properties in hye
#stem is base (root+th) and agr
SubjBaseMono Pres0 PresAgr
SubjBaseMono ImpfAgr 

PATTERN SubjBaseMono
#Monosyllabic verbs which take the prefix gu- in hyw, and have special properties in hye
#base is root and theme
VerbRootComePres(1) VZero VerbRootComePres(2): ThA 
VerbRootCry(1) VZero VerbRootCry(2): ThA 
VerbRootGivePres(1) VZero VerbRootGivePres(2): ThA 


PATTERN DefectiveIndicative
# defectives 
# I won't generalize them just ot be safe
#Some of these don't take prefix 
#Some of them don't have any subjunctive form

VerbRootHaveHye(1) VZero VerbRootHaveHye(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: #   ունեմ defective
VerbRootHaveHye(1) VZero VerbRootHaveHye(2): ThE ImpfAgr Indc0: # 
VerbRootKnow(1) VZero VerbRootKnow(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: # գիտեմ defectve
VerbRootKnow(1) VZero VerbRootKnow(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr3SGThemeEStays Indc0: # Dir/LR
VerbRootKnow(1) VZero VerbRootKnow(2): ThE ImpfAgr Indc0:
VerbRootWorth(1) VZero VerbRootWorth(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: # արժեմ
VerbRootWorth(1) VZero VerbRootWorth(2): ThE Pres0 PresAgr3SGThemeEStays Indc0: # Dir/LR
VerbRootWorth(1) VZero VerbRootWorth(2): ThE ImpfAgr Indc0: # 

VerbRootExist(1) VZero VerbRootExist(2): ThA Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: # կամ defectve
VerbRootExist(1) VZero VerbRootExist(2): ThA ImpfAgr Indc0: 
VerbRootCanShort(1) VZero VerbRootCanShort(2): ThA Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: # արժեմ
VerbRootCanShort(1) VZero VerbRootCanShort(2): ThA ImpfAgr Indc0: 





#imperfect

#U theme vowels behave haphazardly
#For optional variants, can't determine which is preferred form
# :Indc0 VerbRootUc(1) VZero VerbRootUc(2): ThU Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: 
# :Indc0 VerbRootUc(1) VZero VerbRootUc(2): ThU|ThE ImpfAgr Indc0:
# :Indc0 VerbRootNulV(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulV(2): ThU Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: 
# :Indc0 VerbRootNulV(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulV(2): ThE ImpfAgr Indc0: 
# :Indc0 VerbRootNulC(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulC(2): ThU Pres0 PresAgr Indc0: 
# :Indc0 VerbRootNulC(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulC(2): ThE ImpfAgr Indc0: 


# PATTERN SubjunctiveIrregular
#These have an irregular indicative form that lacks prefix
# doesn't seem to exist in hye

 #U theme vowels with C-initial segment behave haphazardly
#For optional variants, can't determine which is preferred form in some cases
#I let it overgeneralize the -e- form to negation even though the grammar only shows -u-
# VerbRootUc(1) VZero VerbRootUc(2): ThU|ThE Pres0 PresAgr Subj0
# VerbRootUc(1) VZero VerbRootUc(2): ThU|ThE ImpfAgr Subj0
# VerbRootNulV(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulV(2): ThU Pres0 PresAgr Subj0
# VerbRootNulV(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulV(2): ThU|ThE ImpfAgr Subj0 #Overgeneralize because no negative form, and not clear about -e- in complex tenses
# VerbRootNulC(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulC(2):  ThU  Pres0 PresAgr Subj0
# VerbRootNulC(1) EmptyNasal VZero VerbRootNulC(2):  ThE ImpfAgr Subj0



PATTERN Past
#Past
VerbStemE ThE Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0
VerbStemE PastAgrGoNo3Sg Indc0 # Dir/LR     for optional գրինք
VerbStemA ThA Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0 


CausBase CausPastHye PastAgrGoNo3Sg Indc0 # -ցր-ինք
CausBase CausPastHye ThE Aor PastAgrYes3SgZero Indc0 # -ցր-եց
CausBase CausPastHye ThE Aor PastAgrGoNo3Sg Indc0 #  Dir/LR -ցր-եց-ինք
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicSchwa VZero  CausPastHye PastAgrGoNo3Sg Indc0 #   [<caus_listed>:]
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicSchwa VZero  CausPastHye ThE Aor PastAgrYes3SgZero Indc0 #    [<caus_listed>:]
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicSchwa VZero CausPastHye ThE Aor PastAgrGoNo3Sg Indc0 #  Dir/LR  [<caus_listed>:]  
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffr VZero CausOrthographicAffrPastHye  PastAgrGoNo3Sg Indc0 #   [<caus_listed>:]
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffr VZero CausOrthographicAffrPastHye ThE Aor PastAgrYes3SgZero Indc0 #   [<caus_listed>:] 
CausativeVerbRootOrthographicAffr VZero CausOrthographicAffrPastHye ThE Aor PastAgrGoNo3Sg Indc0 #  Dir/LR [<caus_listed>:] 



PassBase Pass ThE Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0 #  
PassBase Pass PastAgrGoNo3Sg Indc0 # Dir/LR    


InchBase InchEmpty Aor PastSecAgr Indc0
InchBaseWashHye InchEmpty Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0 # 
